Utah statutes.
53A-18-106.   Bonds a lien on property -- Levy of tax to pay bonds.

(1)  Bonds issued under this chapter are a lien upon the taxable property of the school district issuing them.

(2)  If the local school board neglects or refuses to cause a tax to be levied in accordance with law to meet the outstanding bonds or the interest on the bonds, the county legislative body of the county in which the district is located shall levy the tax and apply the money collected to the payment of the bonds and the interest.

